Utah statutes.
8-5-1.   Unused or unkept lots -- Notice procedures.
(1)  If a municipality or cemetery maintenance district owns a cemetery and
has conveyed cemetery lots or parcels by deed with or without restrictions,
and the grantee, or persons claiming through the grantee, for more than 60
years:
(a)  have not used portions of the lots or parcels for purposes of burial and
have not provided for the care of the lots or parcels beyond that uniformly
provided for all lots of the cemetery, and during the 60-year period have not
given the municipality or cemetery maintenance district written notice of any
claim or interest in the lots or parcels; or
(b)  have not used a portion of the lots or parcels for purposes of burial and
have not kept the lots or parcels free of weeds or brush, but have allowed it
to remain entirely unimproved for more than 20 years, and the lots or parcels
are located in the portion of the cemetery where they adjoin or are adjacent
to improved parts of the cemetery and by reason of their unimproved condition
detract from the appearance of the cemetery, interfere with its harmonious
improvements, and furnish a place for the growth of weeds and brush, then the
municipality or cemetery maintenance district shall demand of the grantee or
persons claiming through the grantee either of the following:
(i)  that they file with the municipality or cemetery maintenance district a
written notice of claim or interest in and to the lots or parcels recorded by
evidence of their claim of ownership within 50 days after the service of a
copy of the notice of demand; or
(ii)  that they keep the premises clear of weeds and in a condition of harmony
with other adjoining lots.
(2)  The municipality or cemetery maintenance district shall serve a copy of
the demand or notice required by Subsection (1) on the grantee or persons
claiming through the grantee in accordance with the Utah Rules of Civil
Procedure.
